Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Publicly funded school districts shall obtain proof of
United States citizenship or legal immigration status from a parent
or legal guardian of a student or emancipated minor at the time of
enrollment. Proof of citizenship or legal immigration status may be
shown through one of the following:
1. An original or certified copy of a United States birth
certificate;
2. A valid, unexpired United States passport;
Req. No. 10431 Page 1

3. A valid Oklahoma driver license;
4. A valid Oklahoma identification card;
5. A Certificate of Naturalization;
6. A Certificate of Citizenship;
7. Consular Report of Birth Abroad or Certification of Birth
with a professional English translation;
8. Unexpired Permanent Resident Card;
9. Unexpired Employment Authorization Card; or
10. Valid, unexpired foreign passport with the original United
States visa entry stamp.
B. 1. Each school district shall record the citizenship status
of each student enrolled, including students for which a parent or a
legal guardian of a student, or the emancipated minor, could not
provide proof of citizenship or legal immigration status as outlined
in subsection A of this section.
2. Each school district shall submit an annual report to the
State Department of Education containing the number of enrolled
students who:
a. provided proof of United States citizenship,
b. provided proof of legal immigration status, and
c. failed to provide proof of citizenship or legal
immigration status.
3. The annual report shall exclude any personally identifiable
information.
Req. No. 10431 Page 2

4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or
inhibit, any child from receiving the education they are entitled to
receive under state or federal law.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10431 SW 12/31/24














Req. No. 10431 Page 3